Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.180

Authority of director.

The director or the director's designee has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice; and

(3) To employ such administrative and clerical staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 256 s 9; 2002 c 86 s 249; 1991 c 334 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.